Tennessee, session 114, SB1974.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Parental Right to Participate in
Schools Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 50, Part 8, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Employee" means an employee of this state;
(2) "Employer" means this state and any department, agency, institution,
board, commission, or other unit thereof;
(3) "Parent or guardian" means:
(A) A biological mother or father of a child;
(B) A person with legal custody of a child;
(C) A person who acts or who has been appointed as a guardian
of a child;
(D) An aunt, uncle, or grandparent of a child; or
(E) A person married to or in a domestic partnership with an
individual listed in subdivisions (a)(3)(A)-(D); and
(4) "School-related activity" means a parent-teacher conference, school-
sponsored performance, rehearsal, sporting event, or another school function
where the child is a participant.
(b)
SB1974
011725
- 1 -

(1) An employee who is a parent or guardian may take up to forty-eight
(48) hours of leave within a calendar year to attend school-related activities for
the employee's child.
(2) The employee may take unpaid leave or use available paid leave,
including vacation, personal, family, compensatory, or leave bank leave, at the
discretion of the employee.
(c) An employee shall provide at least ten (10) days' advance written notice of
the leave request unless the school-related activity was not reasonably foreseeable.
(d) An employer may deny leave if granting such leave would create a
substantial disruption to business operations or make production or service unusually
difficult.
(e)
(1) An employer shall post and maintain notice of the leave available
under this section in a conspicuous place within the workplace.
(2) An employer who willfully fails to post the notice may be fined up to
one hundred dollars ($100) for each day the notice remains unposted.
(f)
(1) The department of labor and workforce development shall enforce
this section.
(2) Employees may file complaints regarding violations of this section
with the department.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011725